Arkansas, session 2025, SB601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-95-202, concerning the definitions used
in the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et
seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq., is amended to add additional subdivisions to
read as follows:
(4) "Healthcare provider" means a healthcare professional,
healthcare facility, or entity licensed or certified to provide healthcare
services in this state as recognized by the Arkansas State Medical Board; and
(5) "Medically underserved population" means the same as defined
in 42 U.S.C. § 254b, as existing on January 1, 2025.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-95-403(b)(3)(A)(iii), concerning the
qualifications for a license to practice medicine in this state, is amended
*JMB508*
04-09-2025 11:23:32 JMB508

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 SB601
to read as follows:
(iii)(a) A foreign medical school whose entrance
requirements and course of instruction have been approved by the Arkansas
State Medical Board Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates.
(b) He Except as provided in subdivision
(b)(3)(A)(iii)(c) of this section, he or she must shall also have:
(1) Served three (3) years as an intern,
resident, or fellow, or a combination thereof, in an accredited postgraduate
medical education program in the United States;
(2) Served three (3) years as an intern
or resident in a postgraduate medical education program outside the United
States, completed all steps of the United States Medical Licensing
Examination, obtained Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates
certification, and either completed one (1) year or more of fellowship
training accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical
Education in the United States or received American Board of Medical
Specialties certification by the American Board of Medical Specialties; or
(3) Completed one (1) year as an intern
or resident in an accredited postgraduate medical education program in the
United States and be currently enrolled in an accredited postgraduate medical
program in Arkansas.
(c) If he or she has been offered full-time
employment as a physician from a healthcare provider that operates in a
medically underserved population in this state, he or she shall:
(1) Hold an active, unencumbered license
to practice medicine in a foreign country;
(2) Have actively practiced medicine
during the four-year period preceding the date of an application under this
section;
(3) Have the Educational Commission for
Foreign Medical Graduates evaluate his or her medical credentials;
(4) Hold an active, valid certificate
issued by the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates; and
(5) Pass the examination used by the
Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates.

04-09-2025 11:23:32 JMB508

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 SB601
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-95-403, concerning the qualifications
for a license to practice medicine in this state, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) An applicant who is licensed under subdivision
(b)(3)(A)(iii)(c) of this section shall:
(A) Maintain his or her employment with the original healthcare
provider that operates in this state for at least three (3) consecutive years
after licensure;
(B) Notify the Arkansas State Medical Board within five (5)
business days after any change of employer;
(C) Appear personally before the Arkansas State Medical
Board together with the sponsoring physician who is licensed by the Arkansas
State Medical Board; and
(D) Present to the Arkansas State Medical Board
information as to what area or department in which he or she will be
practicing medicine and who will be his or her sponsoring physician.
(2) The license issued under subdivision (b)(3)(A)(iii)(c) of
this section shall be a provisional license that authorizes practicing
medicine only within the clinical programs approved by the sponsoring
physician who is licensed by the Arkansas State Medical Board.
(3)(A) The Arkansas State Medical Board shall issue each
provisional license under subdivision (b)(3)(A)(iii)(c) of this section for a
period of one (1) year.
(B) At the end of one (1) year, the provisional license
issued under subdivision (b)(3)(A)(iii)(c) of this section shall lapse, and
if the physician desires to continue the practice of medicine under the
provisional license issued under subdivision (b)(3)(A)(iii)(c) of this
section, the physician shall:
(i) Submit completed renewal forms to the Arkansas
State Medical Board providing information as requested by the Arkansas State
Medical Board;
(ii) Pay a renewal fee as established by the
Arkansas State Medical Board; and
(iii) If requested, appear in person before the
Arkansas State Medical Board, together with the sponsoring physician.
(4) At the end of the second year of practice with a provisional
04-09-2025 11:23:32 JMB508

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 SB601
license under subdivision (b)(3)(A)(iii)(c) of this section, the physician is
eligible for an active, unrestricted license to practice medicine in this
state after review and approval of the Arkansas State Medical Board.
(5) A physician who obtains a license to practice medicine in
the State of Arkansas shall comply with the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, §
17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq., and all
rules of the Arkansas State Medical Board.

/s/Hester



























04-09-2025 11:23:32 JMB508